New York, session 2025-2026, A8891.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5-a of section 17-204 of the election law, as 2 added by chapter 226 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 5-a. "Language minorities" or "language-minority group" means persons 4 who are American Indian, Asian American, Alaskan Natives, speakers of 5 Haitian Creole, or of Spanish heritage. "Language minorities" or 6 "language-minority group" shall also mean persons of Middle Eastern or 7 North African heritage as defined by the federal office of management 8 and budget's statistical policy directive fifteen. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 10 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01724-03-5